Illinois, session 104th, SB2649.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The amount of $20,000,000, or so much of that 5amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General 6Revenue Fund to the Department of Commerce and Economic 7Opportunity for a grant to the Chicago Children's Advocacy 8Center for the purpose of constructing a new building on the 9Chicago Children's Advocacy Center's campus to house the 10Chicago Advocacy Network for Hope initiative and to increase 11capacity for mental health treatment for children and adults 12affected by sexual and domestic violence. 13    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 142025.